Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.240

Secured claims against after-acquired property.

Except as otherwise provided for by statute, property acquired by the estate or by the person over whose property the receiver is appointed after the date of appointment of the receiver is subject to an allowed secured claim to the same extent as would be the case in the absence of a receivership.

[ 2004 c 165 s 26.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.